North Carolina, session 2025, HB1026.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-84.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-84.3. Remote instruction.
…
(b) A public school unit in a county that has received a good cause waiver, as provided
in G.S. 115C-84.2(d), for the school year may use up to 15 remote instruction days or 90 remote
instruction hours when schools are unable to open due to severe weather conditions, energy
shortages, power failures, or other emergency situations and may use that time towards the
required instructional days or hours for the school calendar.
(b1) All other public school units may use not operating under a good cause waiver may:
(1) Use up to five remote instruction days or 30 remote instruction hours when
schools are unable to open due to severe weather conditions, energy shortages,
power failures, or other emergency situations and may use that time towards
the required instructional days or hours for the school calendar.
(2) If a public school unit has used all remote instruction time allowed under
subdivision (1) of this subsection, and the public school unit then experiences
another emergency or is still experiencing an ongoing emergency, then the
school may use up to an additional three remote instruction days or 15 remote
instruction hours. A public school unit using additional remote instruction
time shall comply with the reporting requirements of subdivision (d)(8) of this
section.
(c) Except as provided in Part 7 of Article 14A or Part 3A of Article 16 of this Chapter
or subsection (b) or (b1) of this section, a public school unit shall not use remote instruction to
satisfy the minimum required number of instructional days or hours for the school calendar.
(d) A governing board that chooses to use remote instruction as provided in subsection
(b) of this section shall submit to the State Board, by July 1 annually, a remote instruction plan
that provides a detailed framework for delivering quality remote instruction to students for the
upcoming school year and information on the number of remote instruction days or hours used
in the prior school year to satisfy instructional requirements, when applicable. At a minimum,
the plans submitted by governing boards shall include the following:
…
*H1026-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) For the prior school year, all of the following:
a. The total number of remote instruction days or hours used.
b. The number of additional remote instruction days or hours used
pursuant to subdivision (b1)(2) of this section and a description of the
emergency requiring the use of the additional remote instruction time.
c. For any remote instruction time used, whether the school deviated
from the remote instruction plan submitted for that school year and, if
so, how.
…."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in recurring funds beginning in the
2026-2027 fiscal year for increased administrative costs and providing technical assistance
associated with enforcing this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 1026-First Edition